Utah statutes.
20A-9-701.   Certification of party candidates to county clerks -- Display on ballot.

(1)  No later than August 31 of each regular general election year, the lieutenant governor shall certify to each county clerk the names of each candidate, including candidates for president and vice president, certified by each registered political party as that party’s nominees for offices to be voted upon at the regular general election in that county clerk’s county.

(2)  The names shall be certified by the lieutenant governor and shall be displayed on the ballot as they are provided on the candidate's declaration of candidacy.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

